Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 1
General Provisions

§ 15-5-101. Definitions and use of terms.

Unless otherwise apparent from the context, in this code:

“Incapacitated person” means any person who is impaired, except by minority, to the extent that he lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate responsible decisions concerning his person, provided, that the term shall not refer to a developmentally disabled person as defined in section 66-402(5), Idaho Code, and provided further that:

“Incapacity” means a legal, not a medical disability and shall be measured by function limitations and it shall be construed to mean or refer to any person who has suffered, is suffering, or is likely to suffer, substantial harm due to an inability to provide for his personal needs for food, clothing, shelter, health care, or safety, or an inability to manage his or her property or financial affairs;

Inability to provide for personal needs or to manage property shall be evidenced by acts or occurrences, or statements which strongly indicate imminent acts or occurrences; material evidence of inability must have occurred within twelve (12) months prior to the filing of the petition for guardianship or conservatorship;

Isolated instances of simple negligence or improvidence, lack of resources, or any act, occurrence, or statement, if that act, occurrence, or statement is the product of an informed judgment, shall not constitute evidence of inability to provide for personal needs or to manage property;

“Informed judgment” means a choice made by a person who has the ability to make such a choice, and who makes it voluntarily after all relevant information necessary to making the decision has been provided, and who understands that he is free to choose or refuse any alternative available and who clearly indicates or expresses the outcome of his choice;

A “protective proceeding” is a proceeding under the provisions of section 15-5-401, Idaho Code, to determine that a person cannot effectively manage or apply his estate to necessary ends, either because he lacks the ability or is otherwise inconvenienced, or because he is a minor, and to secure administration of his estate by a conservator or other appropriate relief;

A “protected person” is a minor or other person for whom a conservator has been appointed or other protective order has been made;

A “ward” is a person for whom a guardian has been appointed. A “minor ward” is a minor for whom a guardian has been appointed solely because of minority.

Article V [Chapter 5], entitled “Protection of Persons Under Disability and Their Property” embodies separate systems of guardianship to protect persons of minors and mental incompetents. It also includes provisions for a type of power of attorney that does not terminate on disability of the principal which may be used by adults approaching senility or incompetence to avoid the necessity for other kinds of protective regimes. Finally, Part 4 of the Article [Chapter] offers a system of protective proceedings, including conservatorships, to provide for the management of substantial aggregations of property of persons who are, for one reason or another, including minority and mental incompetence, unable to manage their own property.
It should be emphasized that the Article [Chapter] contains many provisions designed to minimize or avoid the necessity of guardianship and protective proceedings, as well as provisions designed to simplify and minimize arrangements which become necessary for care of persons or their property. The power of attorney which confers authority notwithstanding later incompetence is one example of the former. Another is a facility of payment provision which permits relatively small sums owed to a minor to be paid whether or not there is a guardian or other official who has been designated to act for the minor. A new device tending to simplify necessary protective proceedings, is found in provisions in Part 4 which permit a judge to make appropriate orders concerning the property of a disabled person without appointing a fiduciary.

The highspots of the several parts of Article V [Chapter 5], considered in somewhat more detail, include the following:

The facility of payment clause, which is Section 5-103 in Part 1, permits one owing up to $5,000 per year to a minor to be validly discharged by payment to the minor, if he is over eighteen or married, to the minor’s parent or grandparent or other adult with whom the minor resides, to a guardian, or by deposit in an account in the name of the minor.

A provision in Part 2 permits the surviving parent of a minor to designate a guardian by will. A similar provision in Part 3 authorizes a parent or spouse to designate a guardian for an incapacitated person by will. Such designation becomes effective upon probate of the will and the filing of an acceptance by the guardian. Thereafter the status of guardian and ward arises. It is like guardianship of the person, rather than of estate. It is described as a parental relationship without the parental obligation of support. The relationship follows the guardian and ward and is properly recognized and implemented, as and when necessary, by the courts of any jurisdiction where these persons may be located. No requirement of periodic reports or accounts is imposed on a testamentary guardian. The question of his proper expenditure of the small sums which he may receive for the ward is left to be settled by the guardian and ward after the ward attains full age. If the amounts involved becomes more than the guardian cares to be responsible for on this basis, he or any other interested person may seek the appointment of a property manager who is called a “conservator” by the Code. The guardian may be eligible to be appointed to this position.

A parent or guardian is permitted to delegate his authority for short periods as necessitated by anticipated absence or incapacity.

As previously mentioned, Part 4 of the Article [Chapter] deals with protective proceedings designed to permit substantial property interests of minors and others unable properly to manage their own affairs to be controlled by court order or managed by a conservator appointed by the court. The causes for inability of owner-management that are listed by the statute are quite broad. Technical incompetency is but one of several reasons why one may be unable to manage his affairs. See Section 5-401 (2) [15-5-401(b)]. The draftsmen’s view was that reliance should be placed on the fact that the court applying the statute would be a full power court and on the various procedural safeguards, including a right to jury trial, to protect against unwise use of the proceedings, rather than to attempt to state and rely upon a narrow or technical test of lack of ability.
Section 5-409 is important, for it makes it clear that a court entertaining a protective proceeding has full power, through its orders, to do anything the protected person himself might have done if not disabled. Another provision broadens the form of relief so that the court may handle a single transaction, like renewal of a mortgage, or a sale and related investment of proceeds, which is recommended in respect to the affairs of a protected person directly by its orders rather than through the appointment of a conservator.

If a conservator is appointed, provisions in Part 4 of the draft give him broad powers of management that may be exercised without a court order. On the other hand, provision is made for restricting the managerial or distribution powers of a conservator, provided notation of the restriction appears on his letters of appointment. Unless restricted, the fiduciary may be able to distribute and end the arrangement without court order if he can meet the terms of the Act. Among other kinds of expenditures and disbursements authorized, payments for the support and education of the protected person as determined by a guardian of the protected person, if any, or by the conservator, if there is no guardian, are approved. Also, certain payments for the support of dependents of the protected person are approved by the Code and hence would require no special approval.

Other provisions in Part 4 round out the relationship of protective proceedings to creditors of the protected person and persons who deal with a conservator. Claims are handled by the conservator who is given a fiduciary responsibility to claimants and suitable discretion concerning allowance. If questions arise, the appointing court has all needed power to deal with disputes with creditors. The draft changes the common law rule that contracts of a guardian are his personal responsibility. A conservator is not liable personally on contracts made for the estate unless he agrees to such liability. A section buttresses the managerial powers given to conservator by protecting all persons who deal with them.

Another section seeks to reduce the importance of state lines in respect to the authority of conservators by permitting appointees of foreign courts to act locally. Also, it follows the pattern of Article III [Chapter 3] dealing with ancillary administration of decedents’ estates by giving the conservator appointed at the domicile of the protected person priority for appointment locally in case local administration of a protected person’s assets becomes necessary.

The many states which have adopted the Uniform Veterans Guardianship Act now have two systems for protection of the property of minors and mental incompetents, one of which applies if the property was derived, in whole or in part, from benefits paid by the Veterans Administration and its minor or incompetent owner is or has been a beneficiary of the Veterans Administration, and the other of which applies to all other property. It is sometimes difficult to ascertain whether a person has ever received a benefit from the Veterans Administration and commonly impossible to determine whether property was derived in part from benefits paid by the Veterans Administration. Part 4 would provide a single system for the protection of property of minors and others unable to manage their own property, thus superseding the Uniform Veterans Guardianship Act. It would preserve the right of the Veterans Administration to appear in protective proceedings involving the property of its beneficiaries and would permit the imposition of the same safeguards provided by the superseded Uniform Veterans Guardianship Act.

Part 2 also permits a testamentary guardian of a minor to receive and expend sums payable to the minor for the minor’s support and education without court order. He may not pay himself for services, however, and is under a duty to deposit excess funds, or to seek a suitable property-protection order if other management is needed.

§ 15-5-102. Jurisdiction of subject matter — Consolidation of proceedings.

When both guardianship and protective proceedings as to the same person are commenced or pending in the same court, the proceedings may be consolidated.

§ 15-5-103. Facility of payment or delivery.

Any person under a duty to pay or deliver money or personal property to a minor may perform this duty, in amounts not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per annum, by paying or delivering the money or property to, (1) the minor, if he has attained the age of eighteen (18) years or is married; (2) any person having the care and custody of the minor with whom the minor resides; (3) a guardian of the minor; or (4) a financial institution incident to a deposit in a federally insured savings account in the sole name of the minor and giving notice of the deposit to the minor. This section does not apply if the person making payment or delivery has actual knowledge that a conservator has been appointed or proceedings for appointment of a conservator of the estate of the minor are pending. The persons, other than the minor or any financial institution under (4) of this section, receiving money or property for a minor, are obligated to apply the money to the support and education of the minor, but may not pay themselves except by way of reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses for goods and services necessary for the minor’s support. Any excess sums shall be preserved for future support of the minor and any balance not so used and any property received for the minor must be turned over to the minor when he attains majority. Persons who pay or deliver in accordance with provisions of this section are not responsible for the proper application thereof.

§ 15-5-104. Delegation of powers by parent or guardian.

A parent or a guardian of a minor or incapacitated person, by a properly executed power of attorney, may delegate to another person, for a period not exceeding six (6) months, or in the case of military personnel serving beyond the territorial limits of the United States for a period not exceeding twelve (12) months, any of the parent’s or guardian’s powers regarding care, custody, or property of the minor or ward including, but not limited to, powers for medical care and educational care of the minor or ward, except the parent’s or guardian’s power to consent to marriage or adoption of a minor or ward. The delegation for a minor to a grandparent of the minor, or to a sibling of the minor, or to a sibling of either parent of the minor, shall continue in effect until the time period, or date, or condition set forth in the power of attorney for automatic expiration of the power of attorney occurs. If the power of attorney does not provide a time period, or date, or condition for automatic expiration of the power, the power of attorney shall continue in effect for a period of three (3) years. The power may be revoked prior to the expiration of the three (3) year period, or prior to the time period, or date, or condition for automatic expiration, in a writing delivered to the grandparent or sibling by the delegating parent or guardian. The power of attorney does not need to be notarized or recorded to be valid. However, if the power is recorded, any revocation of the power by a writing must also be recorded before the revocation is effective.

§ 15-5-105. Evidence in proceedings involving veteran’s benefits.

If benefits derived from the United States through the veteran’s administration are involved in any proceeding under this chapter, a certificate of the administrator or his authorized representative shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity of appointment of a guardian or conservator or both if:

It sets forth the age of the minor involved in the proceeding as shown by the records of the veterans administration and the fact that appointment is a condition precedent to payment of any moneys;

It sets forth the fact that a purportedly incapacitated person involved in the proceeding has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration upon examination pursuant to the laws governing such administration and that appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to payment of any moneys due such incapacitated person.

§ 15-5-106. Copies of public records to be furnished.

When a copy of any public record is required by the veterans administration to be used in determining the eligibility of any persons to participate in benefits made available by the veterans administration, the official custodian of such public records shall without charge provide the applicant for such benefits or any person acting on his behalf or the authorized representative of the veterans administration with a certified copy of such record.

§ 15-5-107. Wrongful appropriation.

Upon the petition of anyone interested in the welfare of the ward, anyone suspected of having concealed, embezzled or conveyed away any of the moneys, goods or effects belonging to the ward or his estate may be ordered by the court to appear and be examined on oath and held to account upon such matters and for such property.